incubator/apertium-eng-lvs/dev/verbs.dix
  <!-- pieķert; pieķ -->
    <pardef n="pieķ/ert__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eršu</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersim</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersi</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersit</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ersiet</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ers</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ert</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēru</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ērām</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēri</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ērāt</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēra</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eru</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eram</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>erat</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>er</l>
          <r>ert<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- uzliet; uzl -->
    <pardef n="uzl/iet__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iešu</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iesim</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iesi</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iesiet</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iesit</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ies</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>iet</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēju</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējām</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēji</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ējāt</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ēja</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>eju</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejam</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ejat</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>ej</l>
          <r>iet<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ievest; ieve -->
    <pardef n="ieve/st__vblex">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīšu</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīsim</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīsi</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīsiet</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīsit</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dīs</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="fut"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>st</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dām</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>di</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dāt</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>da</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="past"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>du</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dam</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>dat</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
      <e>
        <p>
          <l>d</l>
          <r>st<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sp"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="pieķert"><i>pieķ</i><par n="pieķ/ert__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="uzliet"><i>uzl</i><par n="uzl/iet__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="ievest"><i>ieve</i><par n="ieve/st__vblex"/></e>
